Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 8. State Health Care Data Authority

§§ 35-2-801 through 35-2-807.
[Terminated.]

Terminated by Laws 1985, ch. 217, § 2; 1988, ch. 47, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1985, ch. 217, § 2, as amended by Laws 1988, ch. 47, § 1, provides: “Effective January 1, 1991, this act shall terminate. If the date for termination is not extended by the legislature, the authority and council shall submit a final report on aggregate health care cost trends in the state to the legislature by January 1, 1991.”

These sections derived from Laws 1985, ch. 217, § 1.